Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. Compulsory Education.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 253 et seq.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, §§ 734-739.

Teacher’s civil liability for administering corporal punishment. 43 ALR2d 469.

Regulations as to fraternities and similar associations connected with educational institution. 10 ALR3d 389.

Student organization registration statement, filed with public school or state university or college, as open to inspection by public. 37 ALR3d 1311.

What constitutes a private, parochial, or denominational school within statute making attendant at such school a compliance with compulsory school attendance law. 65 ALR3d 1222.

Student’s right to compel school officials to issue degree, diploma, or the like. 11 ALR4th 1182.

Sec. 14.30.010.
When attendance compulsory.

Every child between seven and 16 years of age shall attend school at the public school in the district in which the child resides during each school term. Every parent, guardian or other person having the responsibility for or control of a child between seven and 16 years of age shall maintain the child in attendance at a public school in the district in which the child resides during the entire school term, except as provided in (b) of this section.

This section does not apply if a child

is provided an academic education comparable to that offered by the public schools in the area, either by

attendance at a private school in which the teachers are certificated according to AS

14.20.020

;

tutoring by personnel certificated according to AS

14.20.020

; or

attendance at an educational program operated in compliance with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.200

by a religious or other private school;

attends a school operated by the federal government;

has a physical or mental condition that a competent medical authority determines will make attendance impractical;

is in the custody of a court or law enforcement authorities;

is temporarily ill or injured;

has been suspended or expelled under AS

14.03.160

or suspended or denied admittance under AS

14.30.045

;

resides more than two miles from either a public school or a route on which transportation is provided by the school authorities, except that this paragraph does not apply if the child resides within two miles of a federal or private school that the child is eligible and able to attend;

is excused by action of the school board of the district at a regular meeting or by the district superintendent subject to approval by the school board of the district at the next regular meeting;

has completed the 12th grade;

is enrolled in

a state boarding school established under AS 14.16; or

a full-time program of correspondence study approved by the department; in those school districts providing an approved correspondence study program, a student may be enrolled either in the district correspondence program or in the centralized correspondence study program;

is equally well-served by an educational experience approved by the school board as serving the child’s educational interests despite an absence from school, and the request for excuse is made in writing by the child’s parents or guardian and approved by the principal or administrator of the school that the child attends;

is being educated in the child’s home by a parent or legal guardian.

If a parent, legal guardian, or other person having the responsibility for or control of the child elects to enroll a child who is six years of age in first grade at a public school, after enrollment, the child is subject to the provisions of (a) and (b) of this section. If the parent or guardian of a child who is six years of age and is enrolled in first grade at a public school determines, within 60 days after the child is enrolled, that the best interests of the child are not being served by enrollment in the first grade, the child may be withdrawn from school, and the provisions of (a) and (b) of this section do not apply to the child until the child is seven years of age.

History.

(§ 37-7-1 ACLA 1949; am § 36 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 190 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 126 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 11 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 73 SLA 1988; am § 16 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1997; am § 16 ch 113 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For provisions related to part-time school attendance, see AS

14.03.095

.

Administrative Code. —

For local education, see 4 AAC 5.

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

Sec. 14.30.020.
Violations.

A person who knowingly fails to comply with AS

14.30.010

is guilty of a violation. Each five days of unlawful absence under AS

14.30.010

is a separate violation.

History.

(§ 37-7-2 ACLA 1949; am § 37 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 78 SLA 1987)

Cross references. —

For fines for violations, see AS

12.55.035

.

Sec. 14.30.030.
Prevention and reduction of truancy.

The governing body of a school district, including a regional educational attendance area, shall establish procedures to prevent and reduce truancy.

History.

(§ 37-7-3 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1949; am § 38 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 55 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 23 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.30.040.
Extension of provisions to United States public schools for aborigines. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 14.30.045.
Grounds for suspension or denial of admission.

A school age child may be suspended from or denied admission to the public school that the child is otherwise entitled to attend only for the following causes:

continued wilful disobedience or open and persistent defiance of reasonable school authority;

behavior that is inimicable to the welfare, safety, or morals of other pupils or a person employed or volunteering at the school;

a physical or mental condition that in the opinion of a competent medical authority will render the child unable to reasonably benefit from the programs available;

a physical or mental condition that in the opinion of a competent medical authority will cause the attendance of the child to be inimicable to the welfare of other pupils;

conviction of a felony that the governing body of the district determines will cause the attendance of the child to be inimicable to the welfare or education of other pupils.

History.

(§ 39 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For suspension for weapons possession, see AS

14.03.160

.

Administrative Code. —

For physical examination of school children, see 7 AAC 27, art. 5.

Sec. 14.30.047.
Admission or readmission when cause no longer exists.

A child who has been suspended from or denied admittance to a school under AS

14.30.045

(3) or (4) shall be permitted to attend school when the child is obviously recovered or presents to the governing body a statement in writing from a competent medical authority that the child is no longer afflicted with, or suffering from, the physical or mental condition to the extent that it is a cause for suspension or denial of admission under AS

14.30.045

(3) or (4).

A child who has been suspended from or denied admittance to a school for any other cause provided by AS

14.30.045

shall be permitted to attend school when it reasonably appears that the cause has been remedied.

History.

(§ 40 ch 98 SLA 1966)

Sec. 14.30.050.
Truant officers. [Repealed, § 3 ch 78 SLA 1987.]